Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-925.02
Sewers; rental charges; collection.

Any city of the second class or village may make rental charges for the use of an established municipal sewerage system on a fair and impartial basis for services rendered. Such rental charges shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as water charges by the same city or village.

Laws 1947, c. 43, § 1, p. 159;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 262.